New York, session 2025-2026, S724.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1203-g-1 to read as follows: 3 § 1203-g-1. Accessible parking spaces at stadiums, arenas, ballparks, 4 entertainment and sports venues. 1. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or 5 regulation to the contrary, all accessible parking spaces at any stadi- 6 um, arena, ballpark, entertainment or sports venue shall be in full 7 compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. §§ 12101 8 et seq.); located on the shortest accessible route to the accessible 9 entrance in conformity with the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 10 U.S.C. §§ 12101 et seq.); and shall be provided at the lowest price 11 charged for parking at such parking facility on such date. 12 2. All accessible parking spaces at any stadium, arena, ballpark, 13 entertainment or sports venue shall be in compliance with this provision 14 within thirty days of the effective date of this section. 15 3. Failure to comply with this provision and the Americans with Disa- 16 bilities Act (42 U.S.C. §§ 12101 et seq.) as it relates to accessible 17 parking spaces shall result in the automatic suspension of any New York 18 state liquor license held by such venue for a period of thirty days. 19 Such failure to comply shall also result in a suspension of any New York 20 state liquor license held by such venue for a period of one week for 21 each day in which such venue is noncompliant. No liquor shall be sold 22 at such venue during any period of noncompliance. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02643-01-5